Utah statutes.
11-14-305.   Registration, denominations, and exchange of obligations.
(1)  As used in this section, "obligations" means bonds, bond anticipation
notes, and tax anticipation notes.
(2)  Unless otherwise provided by the local political subdivision, Title 15,
Chapter 7, Registered Public Obligations Act, governs and applies to all
obligations issued in registered form.  If Title 15, Chapter 7, Registered
Public Obligations Act, is inapplicable to an issue of obligations, Subsection
(3) governs and applies with respect to such issue.
(3)  Any obligations issued under this chapter may be issued in denominations
as determined by the governing body.  The governing body may provide for the
exchange of any of these obligations after issuance for obligations of larger
or smaller denominations in such manner as may be provided in the authorizing
resolution, provided the obligations in changed denominations shall be
exchanged for the original obligations in like aggregate principal amounts and
in such manner that no overlapping interest is paid; and such obligations in
changed denominations shall bear interest at the same rate or rates, if any,
shall mature on the same date or dates, shall be as nearly as practicable in
the same form except for an appropriate recital as to the exchange, and shall
in all other respects, except as to denominations and numbers, be identical
with the original obligations surrendered for exchange.  Where any exchange is
made under this section, the obligations surrendered by the holders at the
time of exchange shall be cancelled; any such exchange shall be made only at
the request of the holders of the obligations to be surrendered; and the
governing body may require all expenses incurred in connection with such
exchange, including the authorization and issuance of the new obligations, to
be paid by such holders.
